Idaho, session 2025, H0325.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-6203, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-6203. COMMISSIONERS -- CHAIRMAN -- APPOINTMENTS. The governor
shall appoint seven (7) persons to be commissioners of the Idaho housing
and finance association. Preference shall be given to persons representing
persons of low income and to persons with experience in the fields of mort-
gage lending, finance, banking, real estate, or home building. The governor
shall appoint a chairman from among the seven (7) commissioners. The com-
missioners shall be appointed for terms of four (4) years, except that all
vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired term, and provided that the terms
of the first seven (7) commissioners appointed shall end on July 1, 1976, and
that the terms of three (3) commissioners next appointed shall end on July
1, 1978, and that the terms of the remaining four (4) commissioners so next
appointed shall end on July 1, 1980. A commissioner shall hold office until
his successor has been appointed and qualifies. A certificate of the ap-
pointment or reappointment of any commissioner shall be filed in the office
of the secretary of state and in the office of the association, and such cer-
tificate shall be conclusive evidence of the due and proper appointment of
such commissioner. The governor, the state treasurer, the state controller
and the administrator of the division of financial management shall serve as
advisors to the commissioners of the association.
In addition, two (2) members of the Idaho senate, one (1) from the ma-
jority party and one (1) from the minority party, and two (2) members of the
Idaho house of representatives, one (1) from the majority party and one (1)
from the minority party, shall be appointed by the legislative council to
serve as advisors to the commissioners of the association. Such appoint-
ments shall be for a term of two (2) years beginning on January 1 of each odd-
numbered year, and no appointee shall serve more than two (2) terms. Actual
and necessary expenses and per diem shall be allowed as provided for members
of the legislative council, and shall be paid from legislative funds. The
legislative council shall appoint advisory members as provided herein for
terms beginning on July 1, 1980, and expiring January 1, 1981, which terms
shall not be included in the prohibition against more than two (2) terms.


SECTION 2. That Section 67-6223, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-6223. BORROWING POWER -- FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE -- COOPERATION WITH
STATE AND FEDERAL GOVERNMENT. In addition to the powers conferred upon the
association by other provisions of this chapter, the association is empow-
ered to administer any other state, private or federal assistance program
including without limitation all tax credit programs, guaranty, loan or
investment funds and block grants and, to borrow money or accept contri-
butions, grants or other financial assistance or investment from private
sources or from the state or federal government for or in aid of any housing
project, nonprofit facility, economic development project or agricultural
facility within its area of operation, to take over or lease or manage
any housing project, nonprofit facility, economic development project or
agricultural facility or undertaking constructed or owned by the federal
government, and, to these ends, to comply with such conditions and to make
such trust indentures, leases or agreements as may be necessary, conve-
nient or desirable. It is the purpose and intent of this act to authorize
the association to do any and all things necessary or desirable to secure
the financial aid or cooperation of the state or federal government in the
undertaking, construction, maintenance or operation of any housing project,
nonprofit facility, economic development project or agricultural facility
by the association. The association is specifically authorized to work
with the Idaho department of agriculture in connection with any loan for an
agricultural facility and the Idaho department of agriculture shall assist
in the provisions of such loans. Provided, however, that any new federal
grant that is received by the association on or after July 1, 2026, shall be
subject to the provisions of chapter 35, title 67, Idaho Code, including the
provisions relating to the expenditure of federal funds and recognition of
non-cognizable funds.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.